Utah statutes.
9-6-409.   Rights of artist commissioned by program.
An artist who is commissioned by the program to create a work of art has the
following rights with respect to that work of art:
(1)  all rights secured to the artist under federal copyright laws;
(2)  the right to claim authorship of the work of art;
(3)  the right to photographic reproduction of the work of art;
(4)  the right of first refusal:
(a)  to conduct all repair and conservation work on the work of art in
accordance with accepted principles of professional conservation; and
(b)  to purchase the work of art if the state decides to sell it; and
(5)  the right to deny further association of the artist's name with or
authorship of the work of art if conservation or repair work is done by a
person other than the artist, which in the opinion of the artist damages its
integrity.
